Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-255
Mobile barber shop; owner liability.

The owner of each mobile barber shop shall have full responsibility for ensuring that the barber shop is operated in compliance with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations and shall be liable for any and all violations occurring in the barber shop.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 90.
January 1, 2019